Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.170

Depository. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union doing business in this state.

[ 2024 c 164 s 217.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.